Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1211
Attorney's certificate of authority; issuance.

Each attorney by or through whom are issued any policies of, or contracts for, indemnity of the character referred to in section 44-1201, may procure from the Department of Insurance annually a certificate of authority, stating that all the requirements of sections 44-1201 to 44-1214 have been complied with. Upon such compliance, and the payment of the fees and taxes required by this article, the department shall issue such certificate.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 10, p. 462;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 10, p. 685;

C.S.1922, § 7978;

C.S.1929, § 44-1510;

R.S.1943, § 44-1211.